tasks/task5/verbs.lexc
!!! verbs.lexc
!!! Leonel Figueiredo de Alencar leonel.de.alencar@ufc.br
!!! August 26, 2022

Multichar_Symbols +V +FUT +COND +IMPF +PQP +PRS +SBJR +SBJP +SBJF +1 +2 +3 +SG +PL @U.VT.A@ @U.VT.E@ @U.VT.I@ @D.VT.A@

LEXICON Root
< @txt"ar.txt" > ThematicVowel1;
< @txt"er.txt" >  ThematicVowel2;
< @txt"ir.txt" >  ThematicVowel3;

LEXICON ThematicVowel1
@U.VT.A@ PartOfSpeech;

LEXICON ThematicVowel2
@U.VT.E@ PartOfSpeech;

LEXICON ThematicVowel3
@U.VT.I@ PartOfSpeech;

! the asterik "*" marks the preceeding "r" to be deleted
LEXICON PartOfSpeech
+V:*^  MoodTense;
+V:^  Infinitive;
! TODO: compr^a^r^, vend^e^r^, part^i^r^ as intermediate forms?

LEXICON Infinitive
+SBJF:0 Unmarked1SG;

LEXICON MoodTense
+FUT:'re Marked1SGNonPRS;
+IMPF:va Unmarked1SG;
+PQP:ra Unmarked1SG;
+SBJP:sse Unmarked1SG;
+COND:'ria Unmarked1SG;
+PRS:0 Marked1SGPRS;
< %+SBJR:e "@U.VT.A@" > Unmarked1SG;
< %+SBJR:a "@D.VT.A@" > Unmarked1SG;

LEXICON Unmarked1SG
+1+SG:^ #;
  Common;

LEXICON Marked1SGNonPRS
+1+SG:^i #;
  Common;

LEXICON Marked1SGPRS
+1+SG:^o #;
    Common;

LEXICON Common
+2+SG:^s #;
+3+SG:^ #;
+1+PL:^mos #;
+2+PL:^is #;
+3+PL:^m #;
